test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-IA-atoskew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - atoskêw - ok : # Ordinary AI verb - full paradigm
  
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nitatoskân
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kitatoskân
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: atoskêw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg: atoskêyiwa
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nitatoskânân
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kitatoskânaw, kitatoskânânaw]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kitatoskânâwâw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: atoskêwak
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: atoskêyiwa

     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-atoskân, nikîhatoskân]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-atoskân, kikîhatoskân]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-atoskêw, kîhatoskêw]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+4Sg: [kî-atoskêyiwa, kîhatoskêyiwa]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikî-atoskânân, nikîhatoskânân]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikî-atoskânaw, kikîhatoskânaw, kikî-atoskânânaw, kikîhatoskânânaw]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikî-atoskânâwâw, kikîhatoskânâwâw]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-atoskêwak, kîhatoskêwak]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kî-atoskêyiwa, kîhatoskêyiwa]
     
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-atoskêyân, êhatoskêyân]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-atoskêyan, êhatoskêyan]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-atoskêt, êhatoskêt]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-atoskêyit, êhatoskêyit]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-atoskêyâhk, êhatoskêyâhk]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-atoskêyahk, êhatoskêyahk]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-atoskêyêk, êhatoskêyêk]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-atoskêcik, êhatoskêcik]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-atoskêyit, êhatoskêyit]

     atoskêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: atoskê
     atoskêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: atoskêk
     atoskêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: atoskêtân
     
     atoskêw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: atoskêhkan
     atoskêw+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: atoskêhkêk
     atoskêw+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: atoskêhkahk
